Hawaii statutes.
[§584-3] How parent and child relationship
established. The parent and child relationship between a child and:

(1) The natural mother may be established by proof of
her having given birth to the child, or under this chapter;

(2) The natural father may be established under this
chapter;

(3) An adoptive parent may be established by proof of
adoption. [L 1975, c 66, pt of §1]

Case Notes

By their plain language, §584-1 and this section do not state
that this chapter is the exclusive means by which paternity must be
established; thus, this chapter is not the exclusive means by which a
determination of paternity can be made. 99 H. 1, 52 P.3d 255.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next